New Jersey, session 222, S3158.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Whenever any person holding public office, position or employment, whose compensation is paid by this State or by any board, body, agency, authority or commission thereof, hereinafter referred to as "employee," shall indicate in writing to the proper disbursing officer his desire to have his net pay issued in the form of a paper check, the State Treasurer shall disburse the employees net pay in the form indicated by the employee.  The requirements of this section shall also be applicable to all State entities that do not utilize the State centralized payroll system, including public institutions of higher education. 2.    a.   The Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall provide to any claimant, upon filing a claim for benefits, written notice of benefit payment options, which shall include prepaid debit card, direct deposit, and paper check.  The written notice shall require a claimants signature, to be kept on record by the division, in order to designate his benefit payment method as prepaid debit card, direct deposit, or paper check. b.    The division shall afford a claimant the opportunity to change his benefit payment option at any time. The written notice, required pursuant to subsection a. of this section, shall also serve as the form upon which a claimant may change his benefit payment option. The written notice shall require a claimants signature, to be kept on record by the division, in order to change his designated benefit payment option. c.     Any claimant who has filed a claim for benefits and is either awaiting a determination by the division or is currently receiving benefits as of the effective date of this section shall be provided written notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section within 30 days of that date and shall be afforded the opportunity to change his benefit payment option pursuant to subsection b. of this section. 3.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Taxation shall provide a taxpayer due a refund of any State tax the option of receiving the refund in the form of a paper check. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.